Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1002
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that: (1) A great number of Nebraska citizens regularly demand and receive cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, electrology, and body art services; (2) the practices of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, electrology, and body art involve the use of implements and chemicals that, if used or applied improperly, can be hazardous to human health and safety; (3) inadequate sanitation in the practice of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, electrology, or body art can encourage the spread of contagious diseases, infections, and infestations to the detriment of the health and safety of the public; (4) the knowledge of proper sanitation techniques and the proper use of implements and chemicals can best be gained by rigorous and extensive training in cosmetology, nail technology, and esthetics at institutions operated exclusively for such purposes; (5) the need of the public to be served by well-trained persons and the need of cosmetology, nail technology, and esthetics students to receive an appropriate education can best be met through the enactment of standards for the approval of schools of cosmetology, nail technology schools, and schools of esthetics; (6) the effectiveness of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or electrology training and the competency to practice can best be demonstrated by the passage of an impartially administered examination before a person is permitted to practice; (7) continuing competency can best be demonstrated by participation in continuing competency activities; (8) the establishment and maintenance of a safe environment in places where cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, electrology, or body art is practiced can best be ensured through the establishment of operating and sanitary requirements for the safe and sanitary operation of such places; (9) the protection of the health and safety of its citizens is a principal concern and duty of the State of Nebraska; and (10) the reasonable regulation and limitation of a field of practice or occupation for the purpose of protecting the health and safety of the public is a legitimate and justified exercise of the police power of the state.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 38;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-341;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 264.